Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 25.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201677-1025
Tourism attraction, defined.

Tourism attraction
means a place of interest where tourists visit, typically for the inherent
or exhibited cultural value, historical significance, natural or built beauty,
or amusement opportunities, such as historical places, monuments, zoos, aquaria,
museums, art galleries, botanical gardens, skyscrapers, parks, forests, natural
recreation areas, theme parks, ethnic enclaves, historic transportation, and
landmarks.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 25.